Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.390

Purchase by interested party.

When a party entitled to a share of the property, or an encumbrancer entitled to have his or her lien paid out of the sale, becomes a purchaser, the referees may take his or her receipt for so much of the proceeds of the sale as belong to him or her.

[ 2011 c 336 s 229; Code 1881 s 590; 1877 p 123 s 595; 1869 p 140 s 544; RRS s 876.]